North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-62.4 Student Financial Assistance Program

15-62.4-01.
Student financial assistance program.

The state board of higher education shall administer the North Dakota student financial assistance program for the purpose of providing a grant to an individual who demonstrates significant financial need and who:

Graduated from a high school in this state;

Graduated from a high school in a bordering state, pursuant to chapter 15.1-29;

Graduated from a nonpublic high school in a bordering state while residing with a custodial parent in this state;

Completed a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23; or

Received a general educational development high school diploma from the superintendent of public instruction;

Is enrolled at an accredited institution of higher education in this state, provided the institution offers a program of instruction equal to at least two academic years; or

Because of a medically certifiable disability is enrolled at an accredited institution of higher education outside of this state which offers the individual special services or facilities not available in this state, provided the institution offers a program of instruction equal to at least two academic years; and

Is pursuing a course of study determined by the state board of higher education to be at least quarter-time.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 17, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.4-02.
Student financial assistance program — Criteria and procedures.

The state board of higher education shall adopt:

Criteria governing the application process;

Criteria governing the determination of financial need, which must include consideration of parental contributions to educational expenses, but may not include consideration of other scholarships or grants awarded by other public or private entities when determining the unmet financial need of the student;

Criteria governing the selection process; and

Procedures for providing fiscal control, fund accounting, and reports.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 17, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 143, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

15-62.4-03.
Student financial assistance program — Grants.

The state board of higher education shall provide to each eligible student a financial assistance grant in an amount not exceeding:

One thousand one hundred dollars per semester; or

Seven hundred thirty-three dollars per quarter.

A student is not entitled to receive grants under this chapter for more than the equivalent of:

Eight semesters of full-time enrollment; or

Twelve quarters of full-time enrollment.

Notwithstanding subdivision a, a student is not entitled to receive a grant under this chapter after the student obtains a baccalaureate degree.

The board shall forward grants payable under this chapter directly to the institution in which the student is enrolled.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 17, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 3, § 17, effective July 1, 2019.

15-62.4-04.
Student financial assistance program — Advisory board.
[Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 17, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 131, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

15-62.4-05.
Student financial assistance program — Gifts and grants — Acceptance.

The state board of higher education may receive, administer, and expend moneys from public and private sources for the purposes of this chapter.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 17, effective July 1, 2015.